New Jersey, session 222, A170.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  It shall be unlawful for the State, a county, municipality, school district, fire district, or any other government entity or employee thereof to accept or expend any funds from any person, corporation, non-governmental organization, business entity, political party, or any other private entity to be used in preparing, administering, or conducting elections, including registering voters. This section shall not be interpreted to prohibit the State or government entity or employee thereof from receiving or expending any funds allocated to the government entity from the State or federal government for preparing, administering, or conducting an election. Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a crime of the third degree. 2.  It shall be unlawful for any private person to self-appoint or to be employed or appointed in a supervisory capacity to provide direction to any employee or have any role in determining the eligibility of any ballots to be counted or disqualified, unless such employment or appointment is authorized and governed by the provisions of Title 19 of the Revised Statutes applicable to election officials as members of the district boards of elections, county boards of elections, boards of county canvassers, board of state canvassers, and any other officer, official, employee, or judge in their respective capacities. Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a crime of the third degree. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.